Utah statutes.
17C-2-403.   Notice required for continued hearing.

The board shall give notice of a hearing continued under Section 17C-2-402 by announcing at the hearing:

(1)  the date, time, and place the hearing will be resumed; or

(2)  that it is being continued to a later time and causing a notice of the continued hearing to be:

(a) (i)  published once in a newspaper of general circulation within the agency boundaries at least seven days before the hearing is scheduled to resume; or

(ii)  if there is no newspaper of general circulation, posted in at least three conspicuous places within the boundaries of the agency in which the project area or proposed project area is located; and

(b)  published on the Utah Public Notice Website created in Section 63F-1-701, at least seven days before the hearing is schedule to resume.



Amended by Chapter 90, 2010 General Session

